Hawaii statutes.
[§553A-16] Exemption of third person from
liability. A third person in good faith and without court order may act on
the instructions of or otherwise deal with any person purporting to make a
transfer or purporting to act in the capacity of a custodian and, in the
absence of knowledge, is not responsible for determining:

(1) The validity of the purported custodian's
designation;

(2) The propriety of, or the authority under this
chapter for, any act of the purported custodian;

(3) The validity or propriety under this chapter of
any instrument or instructions executed or given either by the person
purporting to make a transfer or by the purported custodian; or

(4) The propriety of the application of any property
of the minor delivered to the purported custodian. [L 1985, c 91, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next